Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-298
Township organization; cessation; commissioners; succeed supervisors.

The board of county commissioners, as herein provided, shall be the legal successor of the board of supervisors in said county. Such board shall thereafter be governed by the laws that shall govern counties not under township organization, and in the same manner that said county would have been governed had not such organization been adopted.

Laws 1885, c. 43, § 7, p. 237;

R.S.1913, § 1062;

C.S.1922, § 964;

C.S.1929, § 26-278;

R.S.1943, § 23-298;

Laws 1945, c. 42, § 4, p. 204.